Massachusetts, session 194th, S2527.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The charter of the town of Wareham, on file in the office of the archivist of the
commonwealth, as provided in section 12 of chapter 43B of the general laws, is hereby amended
by striking out the first paragraph of clause (3) of subsection (a) of section 2-5 and inserting
thereof the following paragraph:-
“Appointments- The Capital Planning Committee shall consist of 7 voting and 1 non-
voting members. The voting members are: the Finance Director or that person’s designee and the
Town Administrator or that person’s designee, who shall serve by virtue of their offices; a
member who shall be appointed by the Planning Board from that Board’s membership; a
member who shall be appointed by the Finance Committee from that Board’s membership; and 3
members who shall be appointed by the Appointing Authority, which body shall consist of the
Town Moderator, who shall serve as chair of the Appointing Authority, the chair of the Select
Board, and the chair of the Finance Committee. The Town may by bylaw provide for other
of 2

conditions regarding these appointments. The Town Accountant or that person’s designee will
serve as an ex-officio nonvoting member.”
of 2